en: E250, Sodium nitrite, NaNO2
xx: E250
ar: E250, نتريت الصوديوم
bg: E250, Натриев нитрит
bs: E250, Natrijum nitrit
ca: E250, Nitrit de sodi, Nitrit sòdic
cs: E250, Dusitan sodný
da: E250, Natriumnitrit
de: E250, Natriumnitrit
el: E250, Νιτρωδες νατριο
eo: E250, natria nitrito
es: E250, Nitrito sódico, Nitrito de sodio
et: E250, Naatriumnitrit
fa: E250, سدیم نیتریت
fi: E250, Natriumnitriitti, Natriumnitriittiä, Natriumnitriitit, Natriumnitriittejä
fr: E250, Nitrite de sodium, Azotite, Nitrite de soude, Nitrite sodique, Sel nitrité, sel de salaison, sels de salaison, sel nitrité pour saumure
ga: E250, nítrít sóidiam
he: E250, נתרן חנקיתי
hr: E250, natrijev nitrit, nitritna sol za salamurenje
hu: E250, Nátrium-nitrit
id: E250, natrium nitrit
it: E250, Nitrito di sodio
ja: E250, 亜硝酸ナトリウム, 亜硝酸Na, 亜硝酸Ｎａ
ko: E250, 아질산 나트륨
ky: E250, Натрий нитрити
lt: E250, Natrio nitritas
lv: E250, Nātrija nitrīts
mt: E250, Nitrit tas-sodju
nb: E250, Natriumnitritt
nl: E250, Natriumnitriet
no: E250, natriumnitritt
pl: E250, Azotyn sodu, Azotan(III) sodu
pt: E250, Nitrito de sódio
ro: E250, Nitrit de sodiu, Azotit de sodiu
ru: E250, Нитрит натрия, Натрия нитрит, Натрий азотокислый, фиксатор окраски, фиксатор окраски-нитрит натрия, фиксатор окраски нитрит натрия
sh: E250, Natrijum nitrit
sk: E250, Dusitan sodný
sl: E250, Natrijev nitrit
sr: E250, натријум нитрит
sv: E250, Natriumnitrit
tr: E250, Sodyum nitrit
uk: E250, Нітрит натрію
vi: E250, Natri nitrit
zh: E250, 亚硝酸钠

en: E251, Sodium nitrate
xx: E251
ar: E251, نترات الصوديوم
bg: E251, Натриев нитрат i., Натриев нитрат
bs: E251, Natrijum nitrat
ca: E251, Nitrat de sodi, nitrat sodic
cs: E251, Dusičnan sodný, Čilský ledek, Chilský ledek, Nitratin
da: E251, Natriumnitrat
de: E251, Natriumnitrat, Chilesalpeter, Natronsalpeter, NaNO3
el: E251, Νιτρικο νατριο, Νίτρο της Χιλής
eo: E251, Natri-salpetro
es: E251, Nitrato sódico i., Nitrato de sodio, Conservante E-251, Nitrato sodico, Conservante E251, Nitrato de soda, Sal de Chile
et: E251, Naatriumnitraat i), Naatriumnitraat
eu: E251, Txileko nitrato
fa: E251, سدیم نیترات
fi: E251, Natriumnitraatti i), Natriumnitraatti, Chilen salpietari, Perunsalpietari, Chilensalpietari, Natriumnitraattia, Chilen salpietaria, Perunsalpietaria, Chilensalpietaria
fr: E251, Nitrate de sodium, 7631-99-4, Salpêtre du Chili, Nitrate de soude, NaNO3
ga: E251, níotráit sóidiam
he: E251, נתרן חנקתי
hi: E251, सोडियम नाइट्रेट
hr: E251, Natrijev nitrat
hu: E251, Nátrium-nitrát
hy: E251, Նատրիումի նիտրատ
id: E251, Natrium nitrat
it: E251, Nitrato di sodio, Nitrato del Cile
ja: E251, 硝酸ナトリウム, 硝酸Na, 硝酸Ｎａ
kk: E251, Натрий нитраты
ko: E251, 질산 나트륨
ky: E251, Натрий нитраты
lt: E251, Natrio nitratas
lv: E251, Nātrija nitrāts i., Nātrija nitrāts, Čīles salpetris, Nātrija salpetris, NaNO3
ms: E251, Natrium nitrat
mt: E251, Nitrat tas-sodju i.
nb: E251, Natriumnitrat
nl: E251, Natriumnitraat, Chilisalpeter
oc: E251, Nitrat de sòdi
pl: E251, Azotan sodu, Saletra chilijska, Nitronatryt, Nitratyn, Azotan(V) sodu, Saletra sodowa
pt: E251, Nitrato de sódio
qu: E251, Natriyu qullpa
ro: E251, Nitrat de sodiu i., Azotat de sodiu, Nitrat de sodiu, Salpetru de Chile
ru: E251, нитрат натрия
sh: E251, Natrijum nitrat
sk: E251, Dusičnan sodný i., Dusičnan sodný
sl: E251, Natrijev nitrat
sq: E251, Nitrati i natriumit
sr: E251, натријум нитрат
sv: E251, Natriumnitrat, Chilesalpeter, Natronsalpeter
ta: E251, சோடியம் நைட்ரேட்டு
tr: E251, Sodyum nitrat
uk: E251, Нітрат натрію
vi: E251, Natri nitrat
zh: E251, 硝酸鈉

en: E252, Potassium nitrate
xx: E252
af: E252, Kaliumnitraat
ar: E252, نترات البوتاسيوم
bg: E252, Калиев нитрат, Калиева селитра
bn: E252, পটাসিয়াম নাইট্রেট
bs: E252, Kalij-nitrat
ca: E252, Nitrat de potassi, Nitrat potàssic
cs: E252, Dusičnan draselný, Salnytr, Sanitr, Ledek draselný, Salnitr, Draselný ledek, Sanytr
da: E252, Kaliumnitrat, KNO3, Kalisalpeter
de: E252, Kaliumnitrat, Kalisalpeter, Kaliumsalpeter, Salpeter
el: E252, Νιτρικο καλιο
eo: E252, kalia nitrato
es: E252, Nitrato potásico, nitrato de potasio, Sal nitro, Conservante E-252, Nitrato de potasa, Conservante E252
et: E252, Kaaliumnitraat
fa: E252, نیترات پتاسیم
fi: E252, Kaliumnitraatti, KNO3, Kalisalpietari, Kaliumnitraattia, Kalisalpietaria
fr: E252, Nitrate de potassium, Salpêtre, Nitre, Nitrate de potasse, 7757-79-1, Nitrate et de potassium, KNO3
ga: E252, níotráit photaisiam
he: E252, אשלגן חנקתי
hi: E252, पोटैशियम नाइट्रेट
hr: E252, kalijev nitrat
hu: E252, Kálium-nitrát
hy: E252, Կալիումի նիտրատ
id: E252, Kalium nitrat
io: E252, Salpetro
is: E252, Saltpétur
it: E252, Nitrato di potassio, Salnitro, KNO3
ja: E252, 硝酸カリウム, 硝酸K, 硝酸Ｋ
kk: E252, Калий селитрасы
ko: E252, 질산 칼륨
ky: E252, Калий нитраты
lt: E252, Kalio nitratas, Kalio salietra, KNO3
lv: E252, Kālija nitrāts, Kālija salpetris, KNO3
mk: E252, калиум нитрат
ms: E252, kalium nitrat
mt: E252, Nitrat tal-potassju
my: E252, ယမ်းစိမ်း
nb: E252, Kaliumnitrat
nl: E252, Kaliumnitraat, Kno3
oc: E252, Saunitre
pl: E252, Azotan potasu, Azotan(V) potasu
pt: E252, Nitrato de potássio, Salitre do Chile, Kno3, Salito
qu: E252, Kalyu qullpa
ro: E252, Nitrat de potasiu, Azotat de potasiu, Salpetru de india, Salpetru
ru: E252, нитрат калия
sh: E252, Šalitra
sk: E252, Dusičnan draselný
sl: E252, Kalijev nitrat
sr: E252, Калијум нитрат
sv: E252, Kaliumnitrat, KNO3, E 252, Kalisalpeter
ta: E252, பொட்டாசியம் நைத்திரேட்டு
th: E252, ดินประสิว
tl: E252, Salitre
tr: E252, Potasyum nitrat
uk: E252, Нітрат калію
vi: E252, kali nitrat
zh: E252, 硝酸钾

en: E260, Acetic acid, ethanoic acid
xx: E260
af: E260, Asynsuur
ar: E260, حمض الخليك
az: E260, Sirkə turşusu
be: E260, воцатная кіслата
bg: E260, Оцетна киселина, Оцетна киселина, Етанова киселина
bn: E260, অ্যাসিটিক এসিড
bs: E260, Acetatna kiselina
ca: E260, Àcid acètic, acid acetic
cs: E260, Kyselina octová, Kyselina octová, Etanová kyselina, Ethanová kyselina, Kyselina ethanová, Kyselina etanová, Acidum aceticum
cy: E260, Asid asetig
da: E260, Eddikesyre, Eddikesyre, Acetat, Ethansyre
de: E260, Essigsäure, Essigsäure, Haushaltsessig, Methancarbonsäure, Acidum aceticum, Acetoxylsäure, Acetat-Ion, Ethansäure, Säureessig, Acetylsäure, Eisessig, Ethoxylsäure, Äthansäure, Methylcarbonsäure, Holzsäure, Essigessenz
el: E260, Οξικο οξυ, Οξικό οξύ, Αιθανικό οξύ, Αιθανοϊκό οξύ
eo: E260, aceta acido
es: E260, Ácido acético, Conservante E260, Ácido acético glacial, Ácido etanoico, Conservante E 260, Etanoico
et: E260, Äädikhape, Äädikhape, Etaanhape
eu: E260, azido azetiko
fa: E260, استیک اسید
fi: E260, Etikkahappo, Etaanihappo, Asetometri, E 260, Jääetikka, CH3COOH, Etikkahappoa, Etaanihappoa, Asetometriä, Jääetikkaa
fr: E260, Acide acétique, Acétification, Acide éthanoïque, 64-19-7, CH3COOH, Acetic acid, Acétique, Acide acétique glacial, AcOH
ga: E260, Aigéad aicéiteach
gl: E260, Ácido acético
he: E260, חומצה אצטית
hi: E260, एसिटिक अम्ल
hr: E260, Octena kiselina
hu: E260, Ecetsav, Ecetsav, Jégecet, Etánsav, Acetát
hy: E260, Քացախաթթու
ia: E260, Acido acetic
id: E260, Asam asetat
io: E260, Acetat-acido
is: E260, Ediksýra
it: E260, Acido acetico, Acido acetico, Acido etanoico, C2H4O2, AcOH, CH3COOH, Acido acetico glaciale
ja: E260, 酢酸
jv: E260, Asam asetat
kk: E260, Сірке қышқылы
kn: E260, ಅಸಿಟಿಕ್ ಆಮ್ಲ
ko: E260, 아세트산
la: E260, Acidum aceticum
li: E260, Aekzoer
lt: E260, Acto rūgštis, Acto rūgštis, Vandenilio acetatas, Metankarboksilinė rūgštis, CH3COOH, Acetilo hidroksidas, Etano rūgštis
lv: E260, Etiķskābe, Etiķskābe, Acetāti, Ch3cooh, Acetāts, Metānkarbonskābe, Etānskābe, Ledus etiķskābe
mk: E260, Оцетна киселина
ml: E260, അസറ്റിക് അമ്ലം
ms: E260, Asid asetik
mt: E260, Aċidu aċetiku, Aċidu aċetiku
nb: E260, eddiksyre
nl: E260, Azijnzuur, Azijnzuur, 64-19-7, CH3COOH, ijsazijn, ethaanzuur
pa: E260, ਐਸੀਟਿਕ ਤੇਜ਼ਾਬ
pl: E260, Kwas octowy, Kwas octowy, CH3COOH, Kwas etanowy, Kwas metanokarboksylowy, Lodowaty kwas octowy
pt: E260, Ácido acético, Ácido acético, Ácido etanoico, Ácido acético glacial, Ácido metanocarboxílico, CH3COOH
qu: E260, Mama aqha p'uchqu
ro: E260, Acid acetic, Acid acetic
sh: E260, Sirćetna kiselina
si: E260, ඇසිටික් අම්ලය
sk: E260, Kyselina octová, Kyselina octová, Kyselina etánová
sl: E260, Ocetna kislina, ocetna kislina
sr: E260, сирћетна киселина
su: E260, Asam asétat
sv: E260, Ättiksyra, Ättiksyra, Ätiksyra, CH3COOH, Isättika, E 260, Ättikssyra, Etansyra
ta: E260, அசிட்டிக் காடி
te: E260, ఎసిటిక్ ఆమ్లం
th: E260, กรดน้ำส้ม
tl: E260, Asidong asetiko
tr: E260, Asetik asit
uk: E260, оцтова кислота, кислота оцтова
ur: E260, ایسیٹک ایسڈ
vi: E260, axit axetic
zh: E260, 乙酸

en: E261, Potassium acetate
xx: E261
ar: E261, أسيتات البوتاسيوم
bg: E261, Калиев ацетат, Калиеви ацетати
bs: E261, Kalijev acetat
ca: E261, Acetat de potassi
cs: E261, Octan draselný, Draselná sůl kyseliny octové, Etanoát draselný, CH3COOK, Acetát draselný, Ethanoát draselný, Draselná sůl kyseliny etanové, E 261, Draselná sůl kyseliny ethanové
da: E261, Kaliumacetat
de: E261, Kaliumacetat, Kaliumacetate, CH3COOK, Kalium aceticum, E 261
el: E261, Οξικο καλιο
eo: E261, kalia acetato
es: E261, Acetato potásico, Acetato de potasio, Etanoato de potasio, E 261
et: E261, Kaaliumatsetaat
fa: E261, پتاسیم استات
fi: E261, Kaliumasetaatti, E 261, Kaliumasetaattia
fr: E261, Acétates de potassium, Acétate de potassium, Diacétate de potassium, 127-08-2, E-261, E261(i)
hr: E261, kalijevi acetati
hu: E261, Kálium-acetát
id: E261, Kalium asetat
it: E261, Acetato di potassio, CH3COOK
ja: E261, 酢酸カリウム
lt: E261, Kalio acetatas
lv: E261, Kālija acetāts
mt: E261, Aċetat tal-potassju
nb: E261, Kaliumacetat
nl: E261, Kaliumacetaat, CH3COOK
pl: E261, Octan potasu
pt: E261, Acetato de potássio, Etanoato de potássio
ro: E261, Acetat de potasiu
ru: E261, ацетат калия
sh: E261, Kalijum acetat
sk: E261, Octan draselný
sl: E261, Kalijev acetat
sr: Kalijum acetat
sv: E261, Kaliumacetat
ta: E261, பொட்டாசியம் அசிட்டேட்டு
tr: E261, Potasyum asetat
uk: E261, Ацетат калію
vi: E261, Kali axetat
zh: E261, 乙酸钾

en: E261(i)
xx: E261(i)

en: E261(ii), Potassium diacetate
xx: E261(ii)

en: E262, Sodium acetates
xx: E262
ca: E262, Acetats de sodi
cs: E262, octany sodné
da: E262, CH_3 COONa
de: E262, Natriumacetate
es: E262, Acetatos de sodio, Acetatos sódico
fi: E262, Natriumasetaatit, Natriumasetaatteja
fr: E262, Acétates de sodium
hr: E262, natrijevi acetati
hu: E262, Nátrium-acetátok
it: E262, acetati di sodio
ja: E262, 酢酸ナトリウム族
nl: E262, natriumacetaten
pl: E262, Octany sodu, Octan sodowy
pt: E262, acetatos de sódio
ru: E262, ацетат натрия
sl: E262, Natrijev acetats
sv: E262, Natriumacetater

en: E262(i), Sodium acetate
xx: E262(i)
ar: E262(i), أسيتات الصوديوم
bg: E262(i), Натриев ацетат
bs: E262(i), Natrij-acetat
ca: E262(i), Acetat de sodi
cs: E262(i), Octan sodný
da: E262(i), Natriumacetat
de: E262(i), Natriumacetat
el: E262(i), Οξικα αλατα του νατριου
eo: E262(i), natria acetato
es: E262(i), Acetato sódico, Acetato de sodio
et: E262(i), Naatriumatsetaat
eu: E262(i), sodio azetato
fa: E262(i), سدیم استات
fi: E262(i), Natriumasetaatti, Natriumasetaattia
fr: E262(i), Acétate de sodium
he: E262(i), סודיום אצטט
hr: E262(i), Natrijev acetat
hu: E262(i), Nátrium-acetát
id: E262(i), Natrium asetat
it: E262(i), Acetato di sodio
ja: E262(i), 酢酸ナトリウム, 酢酸Na, 酢酸Ｎａ
lt: E262(i), Natrio acetatas
lv: E262(i), Nātrija acetāts
mt: E262(i), Aċetat tas-sodju
nb: E262(i), Natriumacetat
nl: E262(i), Natriumacetaat
pl: E262(i), Octan sodu
pt: E262(i), Acetato de sódio
ro: E262(i), Acetat de sodiu
sh: E262(i), Natrijum acetat
sk: E262(i), Octan sodný
sl: E262(i), Natrijev acetat
sr: E262(i), натријум ацетат
sv: E262(i), Natriumacetat
ta: E262(i), சோடியம் அசிட்டேட்
te: E262(i), సోడియం అసిటేట్
tr: E262(i), Sodyum asetat
uk: E262(i), Ацетат натрію
vi: E262(i), Natri axetat
zh: E262(i), 乙酸钠

en: E262(ii), Sodium diacetate
xx: E262(ii)
bg: E262(ii), Натриев диацетат
cs: E262(ii), Hydrogendvojoctan sodný
da: E262(ii), Natriumdiacetat
de: E262(ii), Natriumdiacetat
el: E262(ii), Διοξικο νατριο
eo: E262(ii), Natria duacetato
es: E262(ii), Diacetato de sodio, Diacetato sódico
et: E262(ii), Naatriumdiatsetaat
fi: E262(ii), Natriumvetyasetaatti, Natriumvetyasetaattia
fr: E262(ii), Diacétate de sodium
hu: E262(ii), Nátrium-diacetát
it: E262(ii), Diacetato di sodio
ja: E262(ii), 二酢酸ナトリウム
lt: E262(ii), Natrio diacetatas
lv: E262(ii), Nātrija diacetāts
mt: E262(ii), Diaċetat tas-sodju
nl: E262(ii), Natriumdiacetaat
pl: E262(ii), Dioctan sodu
pt: E262(ii), Diacetato de sódio
ro: E262(ii), Diacetat de sodiu
sh: E262(ii), Natrijum diacetat
sk: E262(ii), Dioctan sodný (kyslý octan sodný)
sl: E262(ii), Natrijev diacetat
sr: E262(ii), Natrijum diacetat
sv: E262(ii), Natriumdiacetat
ta: E262(ii), சோடியம் ஈரசிட்டேட்டு
zh: E262(ii), 双乙酸钠

en: E263, Calcium acetate
xx: E263
ar: E263, أسيتات الكالسيوم
bg: E263, Калциев ацетат
ca: E263, Acetat de calci
cs: E263, Octan vápenatý, Vápenatá sůl kyseliny ethanové, Vápenatá sůl kyseliny octové, Acetát vápenatý, Ethanoát vápenatý
cy: E263, calsiwm asetad
da: E263, Calciumacetat
de: E263, Calciumacetat, (CH3COO)2Ca, E 263, Kalziumacetat, Calciumdiacetat
el: E263, Οξικα αλατα του ασβεστιου
eo: E263, kalcia acetato
es: E263, Acetato de calcio, E-263, Conservante E-263, Conservante E263
et: E263, Kaltsiumatsetaat
fi: E263, Kalsiumasetaatti, E 263, Kalsiumasetaattia
fr: E263, Acétate de calcium, C4H6O4Ca, C4H6CaO4, Ca(C2H3O2)2, 62-54-4
hr: E263, kalcijev acetat
hu: E263, Kalcium-acetát
id: E263, Kalsium asetat
it: E263, Acetato di calcio, (CH3COO)2Ca
ja: E263, 酢酸カルシウム, 酢酸Ca, 酢酸Ｃａ
lt: E263, Kalcio acetatas
lv: E263, Kalcija acetāts
mt: E263, Aċetat tal-kalċju
nl: E263, Calciumacetaat
pl: E263, Octan wapnia, Wapno szare
pt: E263, Acetato de cálcio
ro: E263, Acetat de calciu
sh: E263, Kalcijum acetat
sk: E263, Octan vápenatý
sl: E263, Kalcijev acetat
sr: E263, Kalcijum acetat
sv: E263, Kalciumacetat
ta: E263, கால்சியம் அசிட்டேட்டு
tr: E263, Kalsiyum asetat
vi: E263, Canxi axetat
zh: E263, 乙酸钙

en: E264, Ammonium acetate
xx: E264
ar: E264, أسيتات الأمونيوم
az: E264, Ammonyum asetat
bg: E264, Амониев ацетат
ca: E264, Acetat d'amoni
cs: E264, Octan amonný
da: E264, Ammoniumacetat
de: E264, Ammoniumacetat
el: E264, Οξικό αμμώνιο
eo: E264, Amonia acetato
es: E264, Acetato de amonio
et: E264, Ammooniumatsetaat
fi: E264, Ammoniumasetaatti, Ammoniumasetaattia
fr: E264, Acétate d'ammonium
hu: E264, Ammónium-acetát
it: E264, Acetato di ammonio
ja: E264, 酢酸アンモニウム
ko: E264, 아세트산 암모늄
lt: E264, Amonio acetatas
lv: E264, Amonija acetāts
nl: E264, Ammoniumacetaat
pl: E264, Octan amonu
pt: E264, Acetato de amónio
ro: E264, Acetat de amoniu
ru: E264, Ацетат аммония
sk: E264, Octan amónny
sl: E264, Amonijev acetat
sv: E264, Ammoniumacetat
zh: E264, 乙酸铵

en: E265, Dehydroacetic acid
xx: E265
bg: E265, Киселина дехидроацетна
cs: E265, Dehydrooctová kyselina
da: E265, Dehydroeddikesyre
de: E265, Dehydroessigsäure
el: E265, Αποξηραμένο οξύ αιθανοϊκό
es: E265, Ácido dehidroacético
et: E265, Dehüdroäädikhape
fi: E265, Dehydroetikkahappo, Dehydroetikkahappoa
fr: E265, Acide déhydracétique, Acide déhydroacétique
hu: E265, Dehidroecetsav
it: E265, Acido deidroacetico
lt: E265, Dehidroacto rūgštis
lv: E265, Dehidroacetīnskābe
mt: E265, Aċidu deħidroacetiku
nl: E265, Dehydroazijnzuur
pl: E265, Kwas dehydrooctowy
pt: E265, Ácido dehidroacético
ro: E265, Acid dehidroacetic
sk: E265, Dehydrooctová kyselina
sl: E265, Dehidrooctena kislina
sv: E265, Dehydroättiksyra

en: E266, Sodium dehydroacetate
xx: E266
bg: E266, Натриев дехидроацетат
cs: E266, Sodný dehydroacetát
da: E266, Natriumdehydroacetat
de: E266, Natriumdehydroacetat
el: E266, Νάτριο δευϊδροακετάτη
es: E266, Dehidroacetato de sodio
et: E266, Naatriumdehüdroatsetaat
fi: E266, Natriumdehydroasetaatti, Natriumdehydroasetaattia
fr: E266, Déhydroacétate de sodium
hu: E266, Nátrium-dehidroacetát
it: E266, Deidroacetato di sodio
lt: E266, Natrio dehidroacetatas
lv: E266, Nātrija dehidroacetāts
mt: E266, Dehidroacetat tas-sodju
nl: E266, Natriumdehydroacetaat
pl: E266, Dehydrooctan sodu
pt: E266, Deidroacetato de sódio
ro: E266, Dehidroacetat de sodiu
sk: E266, Sodný dehydroacetát
sl: E266, Natrijev dehidroacetat
sv: E266, Natriumdehydroacetat

en: E267, Buffered vinegar
de: E267, Gepufferter Essig
fr: E267, Vinaigre tamponné
hr: E267, Puferirani ocat
it: E267, Aceto tamponato
nl: Gebufferde azijn, gebufferd azijn

en: E270, Lactic acid, milk acid, 2-Hydroxypropanoic acid
xx: E270
ar: E270, حمض اللبنيك
be: E270, Малочная кіслата
bg: E270, Млечна киселина, Лактат
bs: E270, Mliječna kiselina
ca: E270, Àcid làctic, acid lactic
cs: E270, Kyselina mléčná, Laktát
cy: E270, Asid lactig
da: E270, Mælkesyre, Laktat
de: E270, Milchsäure, L-Lactat, 2-Hydroxypropionsäure, 2-Hydroxypropansäure, Hydroxypropansäure
el: E270, Γαλακτικο οξυ, 2-υδροξυπροπανικό οξύ, Κρεωγαλακτικό οξύ
eo: E270, Lakta acido
es: E270, Ácido láctico, Conservante E270, Acido 2 hidroxipropanoico, Ácido 2 propanoloico, E-270, Conservante E 270, Lactato, e270 de origen vegetal
et: E270, Piimhape, 2-hüdroksüpropaanhape
fa: E270, اسید لاکتیک
fi: E270, Maitohappo, L(+) -maitohappo, Laktaatti, Maitohappoa, Laktaattia
fr: E270, Acide lactique, Acide L-lactique, Lactate, acide lactique Issu de sucre de canne
ga: E270, Aigéad lachtach
gl: E270, Ácido láctico
he: E270, חומצה לקטית
hi: E270, लैक्टिक अम्ल
hr: E270, mliječna kiselina, mlječna kiselina, mliječna kiselinska kultura, mliječno kiselinska kultura
hu: E270, Tejsav
hy: E270, Կաթնաթթու
id: E270, Asam laktat
is: E270, Mjólkursýra
it: E270, Acido lattico, Acido DL-lattico, Acido 2-idrossipropanoico, Acido alfadipropionico, Lattato
ja: E270, 乳酸
ka: E270, რძემჟავა
kk: E270, Сүт қышқылы
ko: E270, 젖산
lb: E270, Mëllechsaier
lt: E270, Pieno rūgštis, Laktatas
lv: E270, Pienskābe, Laktāti, Laktobacilīns, Hidroksipropionskābe
mk: E270, Млечна киселина
ms: E270, Asid laktik
mt: E270, Aċidu lattiku
nb: E270, Melkesyre
nl: E270, Melkzuur
nn: E270, melkesyre
oc: E270, acid lactic
pl: E270, Kwas mlekowy, Mleczan
pt: E270, Ácido láctico, Lactato, Ácido lático, Latato
ro: E270, Acid lactic
ru: E270, Молочная кислота, C3H6O3, Лактат, Е270, кислота молочная, кислота молочная пищевая
sh: E270, Mliječna kiselina
sk: E270, Kyselina mliečna
sl: E270, Mlečna kislina, Laktat
sq: E270, Acidi Laktik
sr: E270, млијечна киселина
su: E270, Asam laktat
sv: E270, Mjölksyra, Laktat, 2-hydroxipropansyra, E 270
ta: E270, லாக்டிக் அமிலம்
te: E270, లాక్టికామ్లం
th: E270, กรดแล็กติก
tr: E270, Laktik asit
uk: E270, Молочна кислота
uz: E270, Sut kislota
vi: E270, axit lactic
zh: E270, 乳酸

en: E280, Propionic acid, Propionic acid, Propanoic acid, CH3CH2COOH
xx: E280
bg: E280, Пропионова киселина, Пропионова киселина, Пропанова киселина
ca: E280, Àcid propiònic, acid propionic
cs: E280, Kyselina propionová, Kyselina propionová, Propanová kyselina, Kyselina propanová, CH3CH2COOH, Propionát, E 280
da: E280, Propionsyre, Propionsyre
de: E280, Propionsäure, Propionsäure, Propionate, CH3CH2COOH, Propanoate, Propansäure, E 280, Ethancarbonsäure, Metacetonsäure, Propionat, Propanoat
el: E280, Προπιονικο οξυ, Προπιονικό οξύ, Προπανικό οξύ
es: E280, Ácido propiónico, Ácido propiónico, Ácido propanoico, Ácido propílico, E 280, Conservante E 280, Propanoico, Conservante E280
et: E280, Propioonhape, Propioonhape
fi: E280, Propionihappo, Propaanihappo, Etaanikarboksyylihappo, Etyylimuurahaishappo, Metyylietikkahappo, Propionihappoa, Propaanihappoa, Etaanikarboksyylihappoa, Etyylimuurahaishappoa, Metyylietikkahappoa
fr: E280, Acide propionique, Acide propanoïque, CH3CH2COOH, 79-09-4, Acide a-cétopropionique
hu: E280, Propionsav, Propionsav
it: E280, Acido propionico, Acido propionico, C2H5COOH, Propanoato, Acido propanoico
lt: E280, Propiono rūgštis, Propiono rūgštis
lv: E280, Propionskābe, Propionskābe, Propānskābe, Propionāti
mt: E280, Aċidu propjoniku, Aċidu propjoniku
nl: E280, Propionzuur, Propionzuur, Propaanzuur
pl: E280, Kwas propionowy, Kwas propionowy, Kwas propanowy, Kwas etanokarboksylowy
pt: E280, Ácido propiónico, Ácido propiónico, Ácido propanoico, Ácido propriônico, Ácido propílico, Propionato
ro: E280, Acid propionic, Acid propionic, Acid propanoic
sk: E280, Kyselina propiónová, Kyselina propiónová, Kyselina propánová
sl: E280, Propionska kislina, propionska kislina
sv: E280, Propionsyra, Propionsyra, Propansyra, E 280, Propiat, Propanoat

en: E281, Sodium propionate
xx: E281
ar: E281, بروبيونات الصوديوم
bg: E281, Натриев пропионат, Натриев пропионат
bs: E281, Natrijum propionat
ca: E281, Propionat de sodi
cs: E281, Propionan sodný synonyma, Propionát sodný
da: E281, Natriumpropionat, Natriumpropionat
de: E281, Natriumpropionat
el: E281, Προπιονικο νατριο, Προπιονικό νάτριο
eo: E281, Natria propanoato
es: E281, Propionato sódico, Propionato de sodio, Propanoato de sodio, Propanoato sodico, Conservante E281, Conservante E-281
et: E281, Naatriumpropionaat, Naatriumpropionaat
fa: E281, سدیم پروپیونات
fi: E281, Natriumpropionaatti, Natriumpropanaatti, Natriumpropionaattia, Natriumpropanaattia
fr: E281, Propionate de sodium
hr: E281
hu: E281, Nátrium-propionát
hy: E281, Նատրիումի պրոպիոնատ
it: E281, Propionato di sodio, Propionato di sodio
ja: E281, プロピオン酸ナトリウム, プロピオン酸Na, プロピオン酸Ｎａ
lt: E281, Natrio propionatas, Natrio propionatas
lv: E281, Nātrija propionāts, Nātrija propionāts
mt: E281, Propjonat tas-sodju, Propjonat tas-sodju
nl: E281, Natriumpropionaat, Natriumpropionaat
pl: E281, Propionian sodu, Propionian sodu
pt: E281, Propionato de sódio, Propionato de sódio
ro: E281, Propionat de sodiu, Propionat de sodiu
ru: E281, Пропионат натрия
sh: E281, Natrijum propionat
sk: E281, Propionan sodný, Propionan sodný
sl: E281, Natrijev propionat, natrijev propionat
sr: E281, Natrijum propionat
sv: E281, Natriumpropionat, Natriumpropionat
ta: E281, சோடியம் புரோப்பனோயேட்டு
tr: E281, Sodyum propionat
vi: E281, Natri propionat
zh: E281, 丙酸钠

en: E282, calcium propionate, calcium propanoate, cal. pro., cal.pro.
xx: E282
ar: E282, بروبيونات الكالسيوم
bg: E282, Калциев пропионат
ca: E282, Propanoat de calci, propionat càlcic
cs: E282, Propionan vápenatý
da: E282, Calciumpropionat
de: E282, Calciumpropionat
el: E282, Προπιονικο ασβεστιο
eo: E282, kalcia propanato
es: E282, Propionato de calcio, propionato cálcico
et: E282, Kaltsiumpropionaat
fa: E282, کلسیم پروپانوات
fi: E282, Kalsiumpropionaatti, Kalsiumpropionaattia
fr: E282, propionate de calcium
hr: E282, kalcijev propionat
hu: E282, kalcium-propionát
it: E282, propionato di calcio
lt: E282, Kalcio propionatas
lv: E282, Kalcija propionāts
mt: E282, Propjonat tal-kalċju
nb: E282, Kalsiumpropionat
nl: E282, calciumpropionaat
pl: E282, propionian wapnia
pt: E282, Propionato de cálcio, Propanoato de cálcio
ro: E282, propionat de calciu
ru: E282, Пропионат кальция
sh: E282, Kalcijum propanoat
sk: E282, Propionan vápenatý
sl: E282, Kalcijev propionat
sv: E282, Kalciumpropionat
zh: E282, 丙酸钙

en: E283, Potassium propionate, Potassium propionate, Potassium propanoate
xx: E283
bg: E283, Калиев пропионат, Калиев пропионат
ca: E283, Propionat de potassi
cs: E283, Propionan draselný synonyma, Propionát draselný
da: E283, Kaliumpropionat, Kaliumpropionat
de: E283, Kaliumpropionat, E 283
el: E283, Προπιονικο καλιο, Προπιονικό κάλιο
es: E283, Propionato potásico, Propionato de potasio, Propanoato de potasio, Conservante E283, Propanoato potásico, E-283, Conservante E 283
et: E283, Kaaliumpropionaat, Kaaliumpropionaat
fi: E283, Kaliumpropionaatti, Kaliumpropanaatti, Kaliumpropionaattia, Kaliumpropanaattia
fr: E283, Propionate de potassium, Propanoate de potassium
hu: E283, Kálium-propionát
it: E283, Propionato di potassio, Propionato di potassio
lt: E283, Kalio propionatas, Kalio propionatas
lv: E283, Kālija propionāts, Kālija propionāts
mt: E283, Propjonat tal-potassju
nl: E283, Kaliumpropionaat, Kaliumpropionaat
pl: E283, Propionian potasu, Propionian potasu
pt: E283, Propionato de potássio, Propionato de potássio
ro: E283, Propionat de potasiu, Propionat de potasiu
sk: E283, Propionan draselný, Propionan draselný
sl: E283, Kalijev propionat, kalijev propionat
sv: E283, Kaliumpropionat, Kaliumpropionat